Utah statutes.
48-2c-1004 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Right to distributions.

At the time a member becomes entitled to receive a distribution from the company, the member has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the company with respect to the distribution.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

